Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 38. Foreclosure Sales

Editor’s note:

This article was numbered as article 4 of chapter 118, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1990, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1990, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor’s notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Law reviews:

For article, “The Agricultural

C

redit Act of 1987”, see 17

C

olo. Law. 611 (1988); for article “Foreclosure by Private Trustee: Now Is the Time for Colorado”, see 65 Den. U.L. Rev. 41 (1988); for article, “Foreclosures of Deeds of Trust and Mortgages: 1990 Statutory Amendments -- Parts I and II”, see 19 Colo. Law. 1601 and 1843 (1990); for article, “Colorado’s New Fraudulent Transfer Statutes”, see 20 Colo. Law. 1815 (1991); for article, “Foreclosure Sale Excess Proceeds”, see 23 Colo. Law. 375 (1994); for article, “Recent Developments in Foreclosure Law”, see 23 Colo. Law. 599 (1994); for article, “Changes Relating to Public Trustee Foreclosures Implemented by Senate Bill 161”, see 31 Colo. Law. 11 (Nov. 2002); for comment, “Closing the Door on Unfair Foreclosure Practices in Colorado”, see 74 U. Colo. L. Rev. 241 (2003); for article, “Public Trustee Foreclosures: Be Aware of What Remains”, see 40 Colo. Law. 61 (Sept. 2011).